Massachusetts, session 194th, H3746.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 16B, as
appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, the following section:-
Section 16C. (a) No person shall retrofit a diesel-powered vehicle with a device, smoke
stack or other equipment that enhances the vehicle’s capacity to emit soot, smoke or other
particular emissions.
(b) No person operating a diesel-powered vehicle shall intentionally release significant
quantities of soot, smoke, or other particulate emissions into the air, onto roadways or other
vehicles in a manner that obstructs or obscures another person's view of the roadway, other users
of the roadway, or a traffic control device or otherwise creates a hazard to a driver.
of 2

(c) Any person who violates this section shall be subject to a penalty of not less than
$100 or more than $1000.
of 2